Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3607
Minor traffic violations; driver's safety training program; certificate; fee.

Any organization or governmental entity desiring to offer a driver's safety training program shall first obtain a certificate from the department, to be renewed annually. The certificate fee and the annual renewal fee shall each be fifty dollars. The fee collected by the department from the organization or governmental entity shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

Laws 2002, LB 1303, § 7.